Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB389.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XXII-CNEW NURSING FACULTY GRANT PROGRAMSection 2201-C. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:12345678910111213141516171819 "Accredited medical college." As follows: (1) An accredited medical college as defined in section 2 of the act of December 20, 1985 (P.L.457, No.112), known as the Medical Practice Act of 1985.(2) An osteopathic medical college as defined in section 2 of the act of October 5, 1978 (P.L.1109, No.261), known as the Osteopathic Medical Practice Act.(3) An institution of higher education that meets the requirements under section 6.1 of the act of May 22, 1951 (P.L.317, No.69), known as The Professional Nursing Law.(4) A program at an institution of higher education that meets the requirements under 49 Pa. Code § 18.131 (relating to recognized educational programs/standards).(5) A program at an institution of higher education that meets the requirements under 49 Pa. Code § 25.151 (relating to certification of physician assistant educational programs).(6) An institution of higher education that meets the requirements under section 3(c) of the act of May 1, 1933 (P.L.216, No.76), known as The Dental Law."Agency." The Pennsylvania Higher Education Assistance Agency."Application." An application for a grant under the program."Eligible individual." An individual who meets the eligibility criteria specified under section 2203-C(c)."Full-time." A faculty course load of 12 or more academic credits in each of two semesters in an academic year of an accredited medical college."Grant." A grant under the program."Nursing faculty member." An individual employed by an 20250HB0389PN0354 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 accredited medical college who is responsible for teaching nursing curriculum on-site. The term does not include an individual who teaches nursing curriculum entirely online."Program." The New Nursing Faculty Grant Program established under section 2202-C.Section 2202-C. New Nursing Faculty Grant Program.The agency shall establish and administer the New Nursing Faculty Grant Program as specified under this article to provide grants to individuals who are nominated by an accredited medical college under section 2203-C(a) and satisfy the eligibility requirements under section 2203-C(c).Section 2203-C. Applications and eligibility for grants.(a) Applications.--No later than 120 days after the effective date of this subsection, the agency shall develop and make available an application form on the agency's publicly accessible Internet website. To apply for or renew a grant, the dean or director of nursing of an accredited medical college shall submit an application to the agency. The application shall include, at a minimum, the following information:(1) The name and current curriculum vitae of each nursing faculty member who is nominated for a grant by the accredited medical college.(2) A v erification of the date of hire or a statement certifying intention to hire each nursing faculty member.(3) An anticipated title and discipline of employment for each nursing faculty member.(4) A d escription of the job functions to be performed by each nursing faculty member.(5) A narrative that substantiates that each nominated nursing faculty member will increase the enrollment capacity 20250HB0389PN0354 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of the accredited medical college and that each employment position was historically difficult to fill.(b) Restrictions.--The number of nominations made by an accredited medical college in an application in accordance with subsection (a) shall be unlimited, but the accredited medical college shall submit each nomination in the application in priority order.(c) Eligibility.--To be eligible for a grant, an individual shall meet all of the following criteria:(1) Be a resident of this Commonwealth. (2) Be employed as or hold a pending offer to become a full-time nursing faculty member at an accredited medical college.(3) Have been employed as a full-time nursing faculty member for a period of no more than three years.(4) Have been nominated by an accredited medical college in an application in accordance with subsection (a).(d) Selection method.--The agency shall establish a selection panel to review each application submitted to the agency. The selection panel shall give priority to nursing faculty positions that have been historically difficult to fill and specify the priority order in an application. The agency shall award grants based on the number of nominations under subsection (a) and the availability of funding for the grants.Section 2204-C. Amount and use of grants.(a) Amount.--The agency may award a grant in an amount of $10,000 to an eligible individual.(b) Use.--An eligible individual may use a grant for the following purposes:(1) Professional expenses.20250HB0389PN0354 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Loan repayment. (3) Salary supplements for work as a nursing faculty member.(c) Renewal.--The agency may renew a grant for up to four additional years if an eligible individual remains in continuous employment as a nursing faculty member at the accredited medical college from which the eligible individual was nominated in accordance with section 2203-C(a), subject to the availability of grant funding. The dean or director of nursing of an accredited medical college shall submit an application to the agency for an eligible individual seeking a grant renewal in accordance with section 2203-C(a). The agency may not renew a grant if an eligible individual transfers to another accredited medical college or institution of higher education, resigns or does not remain a full-time nursing faculty member.(d) Limitations.--The agency shall award grants from money appropriated for the program. The agency shall give first priority for the awarding of grants to applications for renewals of grants under subsection (c). An eligible individual may not transfer a grant to another accredited medical college or institution of higher education.Section 2205-C. Annual report.The agency shall annually publish a report on the program on the agency's publicly accessible Internet website. The agency shall include the following information in the report:(1) The number of eligible individuals receiving grants. (2) Demographic and income statistics of each eligible individual receiving a grant.(3) Each accredited medical college that applied for a grant.20250HB0389PN0354 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) Outcome measures, including the following: (i) The number of grant recipients currently employed as nursing faculty members after three years.(ii) The number of grant recipients currently employed as nursing faculty members after five years.(iii) Any other measures determined by the agency. Section 2206-C. Grants not taxable income.A grant received by an eligible individual shall not be considered taxable income for purposes of Article III of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971.Section 2207-C. Administrative costs.From money appropriated to the agency for the program, the agency may retain a reasonable amount necessary to pay for direct costs to implement the program, not to exceed 5%. The agency shall include an estimate of costs to administer the program within the agency's annual submissions under section 610 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929.Section 2208-C. Regulations and guidelines.The agency shall promulgate regulations and adopt guidelines and procedures necessary to implement this article.Section 2. The sum of $2,300,000 is appropriated from the General Fund to the agency for fiscal year 2025-2026 for the purposes of the addition of Article XXII-C of the act.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0389PN0354 - 6 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526